inc/flattened/createYaml/yaml_output/VTI_CNJ_TI.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup
     
Tests:

  Lemma - ALL :

     waabandan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+1Sg+0SgO/0PlO: waabandanziiwaanen
     waabandan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+2Sg+0SgO/0PlO: waabandanziiwanen
     waabandan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Excl+0SgO/0PlO: waabandanziiwaangen
     waabandan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Incl+0SgO/0PlO: waabandanziiwangen
     waabandan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+2Pl+0SgO/0PlO: waabandanziiwegwen
     waabandan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3SgProx+0SgO/0PlO: waabandanziigwen
     waabandan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3PlProx+0SgO/0PlO: waabandanziiwaagwen
     waabandan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3SgObv+0SgO/0PlO: waabandanziinigwen
     waabandan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+X+0SgO/0PlO: waabandanziiwiingen
     waabandan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+1Sg+0SgO/0PlO: waabandamowaanen
     waabandan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+2Sg+0SgO/0PlO: waabandamowanen
     waabandan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Excl+0SgO/0PlO: waabandamowaangen
     waabandan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Incl+0SgO/0PlO: waabandamowangen
     waabandan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+2Pl+0SgO/0PlO: waabandamowegwen
     waabandan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3SgProx+0SgO/0PlO: waabandamogwen
     waabandan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3PlProx+0SgO/0PlO: waabandamowaagwen
     waabandan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3SgObv+0SgO/0PlO: waabandaminigwen
     waabandan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+X+0SgO/0PlO: waabandamowiingen
     waabandan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+1Sg+0SgO/0PlO: waabandanziwaan
     waabandan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+2Sg+0SgO/0PlO: waabandanziwan
     waabandan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+Excl+0SgO/0PlO: waabandanziwaang
     waabandan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+Incl+0SgO/0PlO: waabandanziwang
     waabandan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+2Pl+0SgO/0PlO: waabandanziweg
     waabandan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3SgProx+0SgO/0PlO: waabandanzig
     waabandan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3PlProx+0SgO/0PlO: waabandanzigwaa
     waabandan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3SgObv+0SgO/0PlO: waabandanzinig
     waabandan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+X+0SgO/0PlO: waabandanzing
     waabandan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0SgO/0PlO: waabandamaan
     waabandan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0SgO/0PlO: waabandaman
     waabandan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+Excl+0SgO/0PlO: waabandamaang
     waabandan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+Incl+0SgO/0PlO: waabandamang
     waabandan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2Pl+0SgO/0PlO: waabandameg
     waabandan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+0SgO/0PlO: waabandang
     waabandan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+0SgO/0PlO: waabandamowaad
     waabandan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3SgObv+0SgO/0PlO: waabandaminid
     waabandan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+X+0SgO/0PlO: waabandaming
     waabandan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+1Sg+0SgO/0PlO: waabandanziwaambaan
     waabandan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+2Sg+0SgO/0PlO: waabandanziwamban
     waabandan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Excl+0SgO/0PlO: waabandanziwaangiban
     waabandan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Incl+0SgO/0PlO: waabandanziwangiban
     waabandan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+2Pl+0SgO/0PlO: [waabandanziwegiban,waabandanziwegoban]
     waabandan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3SgProx+0SgO/0PlO: waabandanzigoban
     waabandan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3PlProx+0SgO/0PlO: waabandanzigwaaban
     waabandan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3SgObv+0SgO/0PlO: waabandanzinigoban
     waabandan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+X+0SgO/0PlO: waabandanzingiban
     waabandan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+1Sg+0SgO/0PlO: waabandamaambaan
     waabandan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2Sg+0SgO/0PlO: waabandamamban
     waabandan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Excl+0SgO/0PlO: waabandamaangiban
     waabandan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Incl+0SgO/0PlO: waabandamangiban
     waabandan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2Pl+0SgO/0PlO: waabandamegiban1
     waabandan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3SgProx+0SgO/0PlO: waabandangiban
     waabandan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3PlProx+0SgO/0PlO: waabandamowaapan
     waabandan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3SgObv+0SgO/0PlO: waabandaminipan
     waabandan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+X+0SgO/0PlO: waabandamingiban
     waabandan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Prt+1Sg+0SgO/0PlO: waabandanziiwaambaanen
     waabandan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Prt+2Sg+0SgO/0PlO: waabandanziiwambanen
     waabandan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Prt+Excl+0SgO/0PlO: waabandanziiwaangibanen
     waabandan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Prt+Incl+0SgO/0PlO: waabandanziiwangibanen
     waabandan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Prt+2Pl+0SgO/0PlO: [waabandanziiwegibanen,waabandanziiwegobanen]
     waabandan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Prt+3SgProx+0SgO/0PlO: waabandanziigobanen
     waabandan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Prt+3PlProx+0SgO/0PlO: waabandanziiwaagobanen
     waabandan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Prt+3SgObv+0SgO/0PlO: waabandanziinigobanen
     waabandan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Prt+X+0SgO/0PlO: waabandanziiwiingibanen
     waabandan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Prt+1Sg+0SgO/0PlO: waabandamowaambaanen
     waabandan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Prt+2Sg+0SgO/0PlO: waabandamowambanen
     waabandan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Prt+Excl+0SgO/0PlO: waabandamowaangibanen
     waabandan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Prt+Incl+0SgO/0PlO: waabandamowangibanen
     waabandan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Prt+2Pl+0SgO/0PlO: [waabandamowegibanen,waabandamowegobanen]
     waabandan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Prt+3SgProx+0SgO/0PlO: waabandamogobanen
     waabandan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Prt+3PlProx+0SgO/0PlO: waabandamowaagobanen
     waabandan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Prt+3SgObv+0SgO/0PlO: waabandaminigobanen
     waabandan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Prt+X+0SgO/0PlO: wabandamowiingibanen
